Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 7A.180 is amended to read as follows:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act[this section]:
(1) "Application" means software components resting on infrastructure that may be
used to create, use, store, or share data and information to enable support of a
business function;
(2) "Committee[Board]" means the[ Investments in] Information Technology[
Improvement and Modernization Projects] Oversight Committee[Board];
(3)[(2)] "Cybersecurity system" means an information technology system or
application used to protect against the criminal or unauthorized use of electronic
data held by a state agency;
(4) "Information technology system" means any related computer or
telecommunication components that provide a functional system for a specific
business purpose and contain one (1) or more of the following:
1. Hardware;
2. Software, including application software, systems management software,
utility software, or communications software;
3. Professional services for requirements analysis, system integration,
installation, implementation, or data conversion services; or
4. Digital data products, including acquisition and quality control;[ and]
(5)[(3)] "Legacy system" means an information technology system or application
that:
(a) Is no longer supported by a vendor;
(b) Is written in a programming language people no longer learn;
(c) Does not comply with state or federal regulations;
(d) Is incompatible with advanced technology;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2025 1:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 355
(e) Is inefficient or no longer meets the needs for the state agency's workforce;
or
(f) Includes applications developed by a state agency which were written
decades ago and for which the state agency does not have the expertise to
support or maintain; and
(6) "State agency" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau,
committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other
entity of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government.
Section 2. KRS 7A.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The[ Investments in] Information Technology[ Improvement and Modernization
Projects] Oversight Committee[Board] is hereby established and shall consist of six
(6) members to be appointed as follows[in accordance with the following]:
(a) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint three (3) current
members of the House of Representatives, one (1) of whom shall be
designated co-chair, and at least one (1) of the three (3) members shall
represent the minority party;
(b) The President of the Senate shall appoint three (3) current members of the
Senate, one (1) of whom shall be designated co-chair, and at least one (1) of
the three (3) members shall represent the minority party; and
(c) All members shall be active members of the Kentucky General Assembly
during their terms of appointment.
(2) Any vacancy on the committee[board] shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment.
(3) The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for committee[board] meetings,
agendas, and presiding at committee[board] meetings.
(4) On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the[ monthly]
meeting date. A[ monthly] meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2025 1:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 355
chairs. The committee[board] shall meet at least twice during each calendar year.
(5) Members of the committee[board] shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.
(6) A majority of the entire membership of the committee[board] shall constitute a
quorum, and all actions of the committee[board] shall be by vote of a majority of its
entire membership.
(7) The purpose of the committee[board] is to:
(a) Review investment and funding strategies[ for projects] to improve or
modernize state agency information technology systems or applications,
including:
1. Legacy systems;[system projects and ]
2. Cybersecurity systems[projects]; and
3.[2.] The current and ongoing operation and maintenance of state agency
information technology systems or applications[resources];
(b) Determine the appropriate organizational structure for deployment of
technology across the Commonwealth; and
(c) Review the latest information technology developments trending across the
nation.
Section 3. KRS 7A.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Not later than July 30, 2025, ]The committee[board], in consultation with the
Commonwealth Office of Technology, shall prescribe the form, contents, and
manner of submission of data to fulfill the purposes under subsection (7) of
Section 2 of this Act and to provide an inventory of existing information
technology systems or applications[ the plan required under this section].
(2)[ Each state agency shall submit the plan developed under this section to the :
(a) Commonwealth Office of Technology; and
(b) board.
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2025 1:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 355
(3)] (a) Not later than July 15[October 1], 2025, and not later than April 15, 2027,
and each April 15 biennially thereafter, each state agency in the executive,
legislative, and judicial branches of state government shall submit
information to the committee[prepare an agency-wide plan] outlining the
manner in which the agency intends to transition its information technology
systems or applications[and data-related services and capabilities] into a
modern, integrated, secure, and effective technological environment,
including a six (6) year outline and funding sources for that transition.
(b) Each state agency shall provide information regarding an estimated
timeline and funding source for:
1. Each legacy system;
2. Each cybersecurity system;
3. The maintenance or upgrade required for an existing information
technology system or application; and
4. Each planned development of a future information technology system
or application required within the state agency.
(c) Each state agency may consult with and obtain information from the
Commonwealth Office of Technology to carry out the requirements of this
subsection.
(3)[(4)] (a) On or before October[December] 1, 2025, and biennially thereafter, the
committee[board] shall provide a written report to the Legislative Research
Commission that identifies:
1. Existing and planned information technology systems or
applications[projects] to improve or modernize state agency information
technology systems; and
2. The method of funding for each information technology system or
application[project] identified by the state agency[board].
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2025 1:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 355
(b) The written report to the Legislative Research Commission shall include:
1. A recommendation by the committee[board] of the estimated amount
necessary to fully fund to completion each information technology
system or application[project] identified[ by the board]; and
2. Strategies developed by the committee[board] to ensure a long-term
investment solution is in place[ for projects] to improve or modernize[
state agency] information technology systems or applications[ are in
place], including strategies to:
a. Access the full amount of federal moneys available[ for those
projects]; and
b. Use information gathered by the state agency[department during
previous projects] to improve the management, oversight, and
transparency of future information technology systems or
applications[projects].
Section 4. Whereas the original timeline established for submission of required
reports by state agencies does not meet the current budget request submission process, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/4/2025 1:02 PM Jacketed